Florida, session 2026, HB6011.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (6) of section
112.3148, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
112.3148 Reporting and prohibited receipt of gifts by
individuals filing full or limited public disclosure of
financial interests and by procurement employees.—
(6)
(d) No later than July 1 of each year, each reporting
individual or procurement employee shall file a statement
listing each gift having a value in excess of $100 received by
the reporting individual or procurement employee, either
directly or indirectly, from a governmental entity or a direct-
support organization specifically authorized by law to support a
governmental entity. The statement shall list the name of the
person providing the gift, a description of the gift, the date
or dates on which the gift was given, and the value of the total
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6011 2026
gifts given during the calendar year for which the report is
made. The reporting individual or procurement employee shall
attach to the statement any report received by him or her in
accordance with paragraph (c), which report shall become a
public record when filed with the statement of the reporting
individual or procurement employee. The reporting individual or
procurement employee may explain any differences between the
report of the reporting individual or procurement employee and
the attached reports. The annual report filed by a reporting
individual shall be filed with the financial disclosure
statement required by either s. 8, Art. II of the State
Constitution or s. 112.3145, as applicable to the reporting
individual. The annual report filed by a procurement employee
shall be filed with the Commission on Ethics. The report filed
by a reporting individual or procurement employee who left
office or employment during the calendar year covered by the
report shall be filed by July 1 of the year after leaving office
or employment at the same location as his or her final financial
disclosure statement or, in the case of a former procurement
employee, with the Commission on Ethics.
Section 2. Subsection (6) of section 112.3149, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
112.3149 Solicitation and disclosure of honoraria.—
(6) A reporting individual or procurement employee who
receives payment or provision of expenses related to any
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6011 2026
honorarium event from a person who is prohibited by subsection
(4) from paying an honorarium to a reporting individual or
procurement employee shall publicly disclose on an annual
statement the name, address, and affiliation of the person
paying or providing the expenses; the amount of the honorarium
expenses; the date of the honorarium event; a description of the
expenses paid or provided on each day of the honorarium event;
and the total value of the expenses provided to the reporting
individual or procurement employee in connection with the
honorarium event. The annual statement of honorarium expenses
shall be filed by July 1 of each year for those expenses
received during the previous calendar year. The reporting
individual or procurement employee shall attach to the annual
statement a copy of each statement received by him or her in
accordance with subsection (5) regarding honorarium expenses
paid or provided during the calendar year for which the annual
statement is filed. The attached statement shall become a public
record upon the filing of the annual report. The annual
statement of a reporting individual shall be filed with the
financial disclosure statement required by either s. 8, Art. II
of the State Constitution or s. 112.3145, as applicable to the
reporting individual. The annual statement of a procurement
employee shall be filed with the Commission on Ethics. The
statement filed by a reporting individual or procurement
employee who left office or employment during the calendar year
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6011-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 6011 2026
covered by the statement shall be filed by July 1 of the year
after leaving office or employment at the same location as his
or her final financial disclosure statement or, in the case of a
former procurement employee, with the Commission on Ethics.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6011-00